District of Columbia statutes.
29-601.06

Governing law.

The internal affairs of a partnership and the liability of a partner as a partner for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the partnership are governed by:

(1)

In the case of a limited liability partnership, the law of the District of Columbia; and

(2)

In the case of a partnership that is not a limited liability partnership, the law of the state of the jurisdiction in which the partnership has its principal office.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(2)(E), 59 DCR 13171

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 33-101.06.
1981 Ed., § 41-151.6.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 106 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.